Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Nonstock, Nonprofit Corporations
273.310.
Revocation of voluntary dissolution proceedings.

A corporation may, at any time prior to the filing of articles of dissolution with the Secretary of State, revoke the action theretofore taken to dissolve the corporation, in the following manner:

If there are members entitled to vote thereon, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending that the voluntary dissolution proceedings be revoked, and directing that the question of such revocation be submitted to a vote at a meeting of members entitled to vote thereon, which may be either an annual or a special meeting. Written notice stating that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of such meeting is to consider the advisability of revoking the voluntary dissolution proceedings, shall be given to each member entitled to vote at such meeting, within the time and in the manner provided in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

for the giving of notice of meetings of members. A resolution to revoke the voluntary dissolution proceedings shall be adopted upon receiving at least two-thirds (2/3) of the votes which members present at such meeting or represented by proxy are entitled to cast.

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote thereon, a resolution to revoke the voluntary dissolution proceedings shall be adopted at a meeting of the board of directors upon receiving the vote of a majority of the directors in office.

Upon the adoption of such resolution by the members, or by the board of directors where there are no members or no members entitled to vote thereon, the corporation may thereupon again conduct its affairs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 47; 1988, ch. 23, § 206, effective January 1, 1989.

273.313.
Articles of dissolution.

At any time after dissolution is authorized and proceedings have not been revoked, articles of dissolution shall be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing and shall set forth:

The name of the corporation;

The date dissolution was authorized;

If there are members entitled to vote thereon:

The number of votes entitled to be cast on the proposal to dissolve;

Either the total number of votes cast for and against dissolution or the total number of undisputed votes cast for dissolution and a statement that the number cast for dissolution was sufficient for approval; and

If voting by voting groups was required, the information required by this paragraph shall be separately provided for each voting group entitled to vote separately on the plan to dissolve;

If there are no members, or no members entitled to vote thereon, a statement of such fact, the date of the meeting of the board of directors at which the resolution to dissolve was adopted and a statement of the fact that such resolution received the vote of a majority of the directors in office; and

A copy of the plan of distribution as adopted by the corporation.

The Secretary of State shall immediately forward one (1) of the exact or conformed copies of the articles of dissolution to the secretary of revenue.

A corporation shall be dissolved upon the effective date of its articles of dissolution.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 48; 1988, ch. 23, § 207, effective January 1, 1989; 2015 ch. 34, § 72, effective June 24, 2015.

273.317.
Filing of articles of dissolution. [Repealed.]

273.318.
Grounds for administrative dissolution. [Repealed.]

273.3181.
Procedure for and effect of administrative dissolution. [Repealed.]

273.3182.
Reinstatement following administrative dissolution or revocation under prior law — Amendment of articles of incorporation to extend or delete period of duration. [Repealed.]

273.3183.
Appeal from denial of reinstatement. [Repealed.]

273.3184.
Permissibility of merger of subsequent reincorporation with reinstated prior corporation — Effect.

The General Assembly finds and declares it to be the public policy of the Commonwealth of Kentucky that each corporation which was refused reinstatement either orally or in writing and subsequently reincorporated as a second corporation may reinstate the first corporation and merge the second corporation into the first corporation. The first corporation shall then be treated as if it had continuous and uninterrupted existence and that the administrative dissolution or revocation had never occurred.

History.

Enact. Acts 1992, ch. 161, § 6, effective April 1, 1992.

Research References and Practice Aids

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Montague and Muehlenkamp, Kentucky Corporate Law Developments, 21 N. Ky. L. Rev. 413 (1994).

273.320.
Involuntary dissolution.

A corporation may be dissolved involuntarily by a decree of the Circuit Court in an action filed by the Attorney General when it is established that:

The corporation is guilty of abuse or misuse of its corporate powers, privileges or franchises, or the corporation has become detrimental to the interest and welfare of the Commonwealth of Kentucky or its citizens; or

The corporation procured its articles of incorporation through fraud; or

The corporation has failed to file its annual report as required by KRS

14A.6-010

; or

The corporation has failed to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state; or

The corporation has failed after change of its registered agent to file in the office of the Secretary of State a statement of such change.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 50; 1988, ch. 23, § 246, effective January 1, 1989; 2010, ch. 151, § 125, effective January 1, 2011.

273.323.
Notification to Attorney General.

The Secretary of State, on or before the last day of December of each year, may certify to the Attorney General the names of all corporations which have given cause for dissolution as provided in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

, together with the facts pertinent thereto. Whenever the Secretary of State shall certify the name of a corporation to the Attorney General as having given any cause for dissolution, the Secretary of State shall concurrently mail to the corporation at its registered office a notice that such certification has been made. Upon the receipt of such certification, the Attorney General may file an action in the name of the state against such corporation for its dissolution. Every such certificate from the Secretary of State to the Attorney General pertaining to the failure of a corporation to file an annual report shall be taken and received in all courts as prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated. If, before action is filed, the corporation shall file its annual report, or shall appoint or maintain a registered agent as provided in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

, or shall file with the Secretary of State the required statement of change of registered agent, such fact shall be forthwith certified by the Secretary of State to the Attorney General and he shall not file an action against such corporation for such cause. If, after action is filed, the corporation shall file its annual report, or shall appoint or maintain a registered agent as provided in KRS 273.161 to 273.390, or shall file with the Secretary of State the required statement of change of registered agent, and shall pay the costs of such action, the action for such cause shall abate.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 51; 1988, ch. 23, § 208, effective January 1, 1989.

273.327.
Venue and process.

Every action for the involuntary dissolution of a corporation shall be commenced by the attorney general in the circuit court of the county in which the registered office of the corporation is situated.

Summons shall issue and be served as in other civil action. If process is returned not found, the attorney general shall have the defendant constructively served as provided in CR 4.05, and shall cause publication to be made in some newspaper published in the county where the registered office of the corporation is situated, containing a notice of the pendency of such action, the title of the court, the title of the action, and the date on or after which default may be entered. The attorney general shall cause a copy of such notice to be mailed, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the corporation at its registered office within ten (10) days after the first publication thereof. The certificate of the attorney general of the mailing of such notice shall be prima facie evidence thereof. Such notice shall be published at least once each week for two (2) successive weeks, and the first publication thereof may begin at any time after the summons has been returned.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 52; 1974, ch. 315, § 42; 1980, ch. 114, § 64, effective July 15, 1980.

273.330.
Jurisdiction of court to liquidate assets and affairs of corporation.

Courts of equity shall have full power to liquidate the assets and affairs of a corporation:

In an action by a member or director when it is made to appear:

That the directors are deadlocked in the management of the corporate affairs and that irreparable injury to the corporation is being suffered or is threatened by reason thereof, and either that the members are unable to break the deadlock or there are no members having voting rights;

That the acts of the directors or those in control of the corporation are illegal, oppressive or fraudulent;

That the members entitled to vote in the election of directors are deadlocked in voting power and have failed for at least two (2) years to elect successors to directors whose terms have expired or would have expired upon the election of their successors;

That the corporate assets are being misapplied or wasted; or

That the corporation is unable to carry out its purposes.

In an action by a creditor:

When the claim of the creditor has been reduced to judgment and an execution thereon has been returned unsatisfied and it is established that the corporation is insolvent; or

When the corporation has admitted in writing that the claim of the creditor is due and owing and it is established that the corporation is insolvent.

Upon application by a corporation to have its dissolution continued under the supervision of the court.

When an action has been filed by the Attorney General to dissolve a corporation and it is established that liquidation of its affairs should precede the entry of a decree of dissolution.

Proceedings under this section shall be brought in the Circuit Court in which the registered office or the principal office of the corporation is situated.

It shall not be necessary to make directors or members parties to any such action or proceedings unless relief is sought against them personally.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 53.

273.333.
Procedure in liquidation of corporation by court.

In a proceeding to liquidate the assets and affairs of a corporation, the court shall have the power to issue injunctions, to appoint a receiver or receivers pendente lite with such powers and duties as the court from time to time may direct, and to take such other proceedings as may be requisite to preserve the corporate assets wherever situated, and to carry on the affairs of the corporation until a full hearing can be had.

After a hearing had upon such notice as the court may direct to be given to all parties to the proceedings and to any other parties in interest designated by the court, the court may appoint a liquidating receiver or receivers with authority to collect the assets of the corporation and, as appropriate, to enter into agreements with creditors for the satisfaction of the corporation’s liabilities. Such liquidating receiver or receivers shall have authority, subject to the order of the court, to sell, convey and dispose of all or any part of the assets of the corporation wherever situated, either at public or private sale. The order appointing such liquidating receiver or receivers shall state their powers and duties. Such powers and duties may be increased or diminished at any time during the proceedings.

The assets of the corporation or the proceeds resulting from a sale, conveyance, or other disposition thereof shall be applied and distributed as follows:

All costs and expenses of the court proceedings and all liabilities and obligations of the corporation shall be paid, satisfied and discharged, or adequate provisions shall be made therefor;

Assets held by the corporation upon condition requiring return, transfer or conveyance, which condition occurs by reason of the dissolution or liquidation, shall be returned, transferred or conveyed in accordance with such requirements;

Assets received and held by the corporation subject to limitations permitting their use only for charitable, religious, eleemosynary, benevolent, educational or similar purposes, but not held upon a condition requiring return, transfer or conveyance by reason of the dissolution or liquidation, shall be transferred or conveyed to one (1) or more domestic or foreign corporations, societies or organizations engaged in activities substantially similar to those of the dissolving or liquidating corporation as the court may direct;

Other assets, if any, shall be distributed in accordance with the provisions of the articles of incorporation or by the bylaws to the extent that the articles of incorporation or bylaws determine the distributive right of members, or any class or classes of members, or provide for distribution to others;

Any remaining assets may be distributed to such persons, societies, organizations or domestic or foreign corporations, whether for profit or not for profit, specified in the plan of distribution adopted as provided in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

, or where no plan of distribution has been adopted, as the court may direct.

The court shall have power to allow, from time to time, as expenses of the liquidation, compensation to the receiver or receivers and to attorneys in the proceeding, and to direct the payment thereof out of the assets of the corporation or the proceeds of any sale or disposition of such assets.

A receiver of a corporation appointed under the provisions of this section shall have authority to sue and defend in all courts in his own name as receiver of such corporation. The court appointing such receiver shall have exclusive jurisdiction of the corporation and its property, wherever situated.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 54; 2012, ch. 81, § 102, effective July 12, 2012.

273.337.
Qualifications of receivers.

A receiver shall in all cases be a citizen of the United States or a corporation for profit authorized to act as receiver, which corporation may be a domestic corporation or a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state, and shall in all cases give such bond as the court may direct with such sureties as the court may require.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 55.

273.340.
Filing of claims in liquidation proceedings.

In proceedings to liquidate the assets and affairs of a corporation the court may require all creditors of the corporation to file with the clerk of the court or with the receiver, in such form as the court may prescribe, proofs under oath of their respective claims. If the court requires the filing of claims it shall fix a date, which shall be not less than four (4) months from the date of the order, as the last day for filing of claims, and shall prescribe the notice that shall be given to creditors and claimants of the date so fixed. Prior to the date so fixed, the court may extend the time for the filing of claims. Creditors and claimants failing to file proofs of claim on or before the date so fixed may be barred, by order of court, from participating in the distribution of the assets of the corporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 56.

273.343.
Discontinuance of liquidation proceedings.

The liquidation of the assets and affairs of a corporation may be discontinued at any time during the liquidation proceedings when it is established that cause for liquidation no longer exists. In such event the court shall dismiss the proceedings and direct the receiver to redeliver to the corporation all its remaining property and assets.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 57.

273.347.
Decree of involuntary dissolution.

In a proceeding to liquidate the assets and affairs of a corporation, when the costs and expenses of such proceeding and all debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation shall have been paid and discharged and all of its remaining property and assets distributed in accordance with the provisions of KRS

273.161

to

273.390

, or in case its property and assets are not sufficient to satisfy and discharge such costs, expenses, debts, and obligations, and all the property and assets have been applied so far as they will go to their payment, the court shall enter a decree dissolving the corporation.

The clerk of the court shall cause a certified copy of a decree entered under subsection (1) of this section to be filed with the Secretary of State. No fee shall be charged by the Secretary of State for the filing thereof. The dissolution shall be effective upon the latter of the date of filing of the decree by the Secretary of State or such later date as is specified in the decree.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 58; 2012, ch. 81, § 103, effective July 12, 2012.

273.350.
Filing of decree of dissolution. [Repealed.]

273.353.
Deposits with State Treasurer.

Upon the voluntary or involuntary dissolution of a corporation, the portion of the assets distributable to any person who is unknown or cannot be found, or who is under disability and there is no person legally competent to receive such distributive portion, shall be reduced to cash and deposited with the State Treasurer and shall be paid over to such person or to his legal representative upon proof satisfactory to the State Treasurer of his right thereto.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 60.

273.357.
Survival of remedy after dissolution.

The dissolution of a corporation either (1) by the filing of articles of dissolution with the Secretary of State, or (2) by a decree of court when the court has not liquidated the assets and affairs of the corporation as provided in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

shall not take away or impair any remedy available to or against the corporation, its directors, officers, or members, for any right or claim existing, or any liability incurred, prior to the dissolution if action or other proceeding thereon is commenced within two (2) years after the date of such dissolution. Any such action or proceeding by or against the corporation may be prosecuted or defended by the corporation in its corporate name. The members, directors, and officers may take corporate or other action appropriate to protect the remedy, right, or claim.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 61; 1988, ch. 23, § 209, effective January 1, 1989; 1998, ch. 341, § 17, effective July 15, 1998.

273.360.
Admission of foreign corporations. [Repealed.]

273.361.
Application for certificate of authority.

Each foreign nonprofit corporation transacting business in the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall comply with KRS

14A.9-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, §
232, effective January 1, 1989; 1998, ch. 341, §
15, effective July 15, 1998; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 66, effective January 1, 2011.

273.3611.
Amended certificate of authority. [Repealed.]

273.3612.
Effect of certificate of authority. [Repealed.]

273.363.
Applicability of service and withdrawal provisions of KRS Chapter 271B. [Repealed.]

273.364.
Corporate name of foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

273.3641.
Registered office and registered agent of foreign corporation.

Each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state shall continuously maintain in this state a registered office and a registered agent that satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.4-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 236, effective January 1, 1989; 1998, ch. 341, § 16, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 151, § 67, effective January 1, 2011.

273.3642.
Change of registered office or registered agent of foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

273.3643.
Resignation of registered agent of foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

273.3644.
Service on foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

273.3645.
Withdrawal of a foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

273.3646.
Grounds for revocation of certificate of authority of foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

273.3647.
Procedure for an effective revocation of certificate of authority of foreign corporation. [Repealed.]

273.3648.
Appeal from revocation. [Repealed.]

273.367.
Annual report of domestic and foreign corporations — Reinstatement of certificate of incorporation. [Repealed.]

273.3671.
Annual report.

Each corporation and each foreign corporation qualified to transact business in this Commonwealth is subject to KRS

14A.6-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, §
244, effective January 1, 1989; 2007, ch. 137, §
85, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
85, effective July 15, 2010; 2010, ch. 133, §
23, effective July 15, 2010; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 68, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/2010). This section was amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 133, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, both effective 7/15/2010. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict; therefore, they have been codified together. Effective 1/1/2011, this section was also repealed and reenacted by the omnibus Kentucky Business Entity Filing Act, 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151.

273.368.
Filing and recording fees.

In respect of the following documents, the fees to be collected by the Secretary of State for filing, when required by this chapter, shall be:

Articles of incorporation, eight dollars ($8);

Articles of amendment, eight dollars ($8);

Restated articles of incorporation, eight dollars ($8);

Articles of merger or consolidation, eight dollars ($8);

Articles of dissolution, five dollars ($5); and

Any other statement or report of a foreign or domestic corporation, eight dollars ($8).

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 27, § 15; 1978, ch. 384, § 454, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 21, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 204, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1998, ch. 341, § 18, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 151, § 69, effective January 1, 2011.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The payment of the filing fee is a condition precedent for filing documents with the Secretary of State, and the Secretary of State may void the filing and return a document after it has been received, stamped, and filed, if the check for payment of that fee has been dishonored.

OAG 89-94

.

273.369.
Charges collected by Secretary of State. [Repealed.]

273.370.
Greater voting requirements.

Whenever, with respect to any action to be taken by the members or directors of a corporation, the articles of incorporation or bylaws require the vote or concurrence of a greater proportion of the directors or members or any class of members than required by KRS

273.161

to

273.390

, the provisions of the articles of incorporation or bylaws shall control.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 65.

273.373.
Waiver of notice.

Whenever any notice is required to be given to any member or director of a corporation under the provisions of KRS

273.161

to

273.390

or under the provisions of the articles of incorporation or bylaws of the corporation, a waiver thereof in writing signed by the person or persons entitled to such notice, whether before or after the time stated therein, shall be equivalent to the giving of such notice.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 66.

273.375.
Director action without meeting.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, action required or permitted by KRS

273.161

to

273.390

to be taken at a board of directors meeting may be taken without a meeting if the action is taken by all members of the board. The action shall be evidenced by one (1) or more written consents describing the action taken, signed by each director, and included in the minutes or filed with the corporate records reflecting the action taken.

Action taken under this section shall be effective when the last director signs the consent, unless the consent specifies a different effective date.

A consent signed under this section shall have the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 67, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/24/2015). This section was created in 2015 Ky. Acts ch. 34. At the time 2015 House Bill 440, which became 2015 Acts ch. 34, was drafted and initially reviewed, the Reviser of Statutes deleted several occurrences of the phrase, “as amended by Sections 66 through 85 of this Act.” One occurrence of this phrase was inadvertently left in the bill as enacted. The Reviser of Statutes has removed this phrase under the authority of KRS

7.136

.

273.377.
Member action without meeting.

Any action required by KRS

273.161

to

273.390

to be taken at a meeting of the members of a corporation, or any action which may be taken at a meeting of the members, may be taken without a meeting if a consent in writing, setting forth the action so taken, shall be signed by all of the members entitled to vote with respect to the subject matter thereof.

The action taken under this section shall be evidenced by one (1) or more written consents describing the action taken, signed by the members taking the action, and delivered to the corporation for inclusion in the minutes or filing with the corporate records.

Action taken under this section shall be effective when consents representing the votes necessary to take the action under this section are delivered to the corporation, or upon delivery of the consents representing the necessary votes, as of a different date if specified in the consent.

Any member giving a consent may revoke the consent by a writing received by the corporation prior to the time that consents representing the votes required to take the action under this section have been delivered to the corporation but may not do so thereafter.

A consent signed under this section shall have the effect of a meeting vote and may be described as such in any document.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 67; 2015 ch. 34, § 75, effective June 24, 2015.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section does not allow normal corporate business to be conducted without meeting if consent in writing is obtained by less than unanimous board membership approval.

OAG 79-250

.

273.380.
Unauthorized assumption of corporate powers.

All persons who assume to act as a corporation without authority so to do shall be jointly and severally liable for all debts and liabilities incurred or arising as a result thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 68.

273.382.
Conversion of Chapter 271B corporation to corporation governed by KRS 273.16 to 273.387.

A corporation organized under KRS Chapter 271B or its predecessors may convert to a corporation organized under and governed by KRS

273.161

to

273.387

as authorized by KRS

271B.10-010

.

A corporation that has been converted under KRS

271B.10-010

shall be for all purposes the same entity that existed before the conversion.

Upon the filing of amended and restated articles of incorporation satisfying the requirements of KRS

271B.10-010

:

All property and contract rights owned by, and all rights, privileges, and immunities of, the converting corporation shall remain vested in the converted corporation without assignment, reversion, or impairment;

All obligations of the converting corporation shall continue as obligations of the converted corporation;

An action or proceeding pending against the converting corporation may be continued as if the conversion had not taken place, and the name of the converted corporation may be substituted in any pending action or proceeding in the name of the converting corporation; and

The corporation shall be a nonstock, nonprofit corporation governed by and subject to all of the limitations and requirements imposed by KRS

273.161

to

273.387

.

Nothing in this section shall authorize the conversion of a corporation organized under this chapter to a corporation organized under KRS Chapter 271B.

History.

Enact. Acts 2005, ch. 182, § 10, effective June 20, 2005.

273.383.
Limitations on business and holding of real estate — Escheat procedure. [Repealed.]

273.387.
Application of act to corporations in existence on June 30, 1968.

KRS

273.161

to

273.390

, so far as it can be made applicable, shall apply to any nonstock, nonprofit corporation in existence on June 30, 1968, which was formed under the general laws of this state relating to religious, educational, charitable, civic, athletic, recreational, and social nonstock, nonprofit corporations, or by special act, for a purpose or purposes for which a corporation might be formed under KRS

273.161

to

273.390

.

It shall not be necessary for any such existing corporation to amend its articles to set forth the provisions required by KRS

273.161

to

273.390

to be set forth in articles of incorporation.

Such existing corporations shall have all the powers enumerated in KRS

273.171

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 71.

273.390.
Title of law.

KRS

273.161

to

273.390

shall be known and may be cited as the “Kentucky Nonprofit Corporation Acts.”

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 1.

273.392.
Interest rate to be paid by water association. [Repealed.]

273.400.
Definition — Internal Revenue Code — Acts prohibited — Policy of state regarding charitable trust — Liability of trustee — Powers of Attorney General.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter:

“Internal Revenue Code” as used in this section means the Internal Revenue Code of 1954, in effect on January 1, 1970, including all appropriate provisions of the Tax Reform Act of 1969 at the date specified in that law, exclusive of any amendments made subsequent to December 31, 1969.

No corporation which is a “private foundation” as defined in Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code shall:

Engage in any act of “self-dealing” (as defined in Section 4941(d) of the Internal Revenue Code) which would give rise to any liability for any tax imposed by Section 4941 of the Internal Revenue Code;

Retain any “excess business holdings” (as defined in Section 4943(c) of the Internal Revenue Code) which would give rise to any liability for any tax imposed by Section 4943 of the Internal Revenue Code;

Make any investment which would jeopardize the carrying out of any of its exempt purposes, within the meaning of Section 4944 of the Internal Revenue Code, so as to give rise to any liability for any tax imposed by Section 4944 of the Internal Revenue Code;

Make any “taxable expenditures” (as defined in Section 4945(d) of the Internal Revenue Code) which would give rise to any liability for any tax imposed by Section 4945 of the Internal Revenue Code.

Each corporation which is a “private foundation” as defined in Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code shall, for the purposes specified in its articles, distribute at such time and in such manner, for each taxable year, amounts at least sufficient to avoid liability for any tax imposed by Section 4942 of the Internal Revenue Code.

Subsections (2) and (3) of this section express the continuing policy of this state with respect to charitable trust interests and are enacted to assist corporations which are “private foundations” as defined in Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code in maintaining various tax benefits extended to them, and shall apply to any corporations described therein; provided, however, subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall not apply to a corporation in existence on July 1, 1972 to the extent that such corporation shall provide to the contrary by amendment to its articles of incorporation adopted after July 1, 1972.

Violation of a provision of subsection (2) or (3) of this section by a corporation to which said provisions are applicable shall not work a forfeiture or dissolution of the corporation. No trustee, director or officer of a corporation to which the provisions of subsection (2) or (3) of this section are applicable shall be personally liable for a violation of a prohibition or requirement of said provisions unless he participated in such violation knowing that it was a violation, nor shall such trustee, director or officer be personally liable if such violation was not willful and was due to reasonable cause; provided, however, that this subsection does not exonerate a trustee, director or officer from any responsibility or liability to which he is subject under any other rule of law, whether or not duplicated in subsection (2) or (3) of this section.

Except as provided in subsection (5) of this section, nothing in this section shall impair the rights and powers of the courts or the Attorney General of this state with respect to any such corporation.

In furtherance of the continuing policy of this state to assist charitable trust interests in maintaining various tax benefits extended to them, the provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall be deemed to have been in force and effect on January 1, 1970; provided, however, the provisions of subsections (2) and (3) of this section shall apply to a corporation organized before January 1, 1970 which is a “private foundation” as defined in Section 509 of the Internal Revenue Code only on and after the first day of its first taxable year (for federal tax purposes) beginning on or after January 1, 1972.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 344, § 4.

273.401.
Fire department membership charges and subscriber fees may be added to property tax bills — Collection and distribution — Collection fee for sheriff.

If a fire department created under the provisions of this chapter is authorized by law to collect membership charges or subscriber fees for combating fires or serving in other emergencies, the legislative body of the city or county where the fire department is located may require those annual membership charges or subscriber fees to be added to property tax bills. The county clerk shall add the annual membership charges or subscriber fees to the tax bills of the affected property owners.

The membership charges or subscriber fees shall be collected and distributed by the sheriff to the appropriate fire departments in the same manner as the other taxes on the bill and unpaid fees or charges shall bear the same penalty as general state and county taxes. This shall be a lien on the property against which it is levied from the time of the levy. The legislative body of the city or county where the fire department is located shall, in consultation with the sheriff and the fire department, set a collection fee for the sheriff to retain an amount not to exceed four and one-fourth percent (4.25%) of the membership charges or subscriber fees collected.

Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, annual membership charges and subscriber fees shall not be added to the property tax bills of property owners within a territory that lies within the corporate limits of a city or that lies within a fire protection district or volunteer fire protection district established pursuant to KRS

75.010

to

75.080

without the written approval of the governing body of the city or the district.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 163, § 4, effective July 15, 2002; 2012, ch. 51, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2016 ch. 117, § 4, effective July 15, 2016.